grammars/class.nouns.lexc
LEXICON VNounBase
[V.Noun]:adjbud^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:adjumarlarl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:alabbanjdja^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:badbong^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:baddumang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:badj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:badjdjo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:badjdjukkali^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:badjkid^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:badjubadju^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bakki^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:balabbala^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:baladj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:baladjdji^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:balanda^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:balang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bambam^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bambarr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bangardi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bangardidjan^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bangkerreng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bangku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:banikin^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:banjdji^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:barlkkan^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:barndadken^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:barndol^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:barrawu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:barrdjungka^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:barrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bawurl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bekka^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bele^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:belerrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:belinj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:benuk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:berlu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:berrebberreb^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:berrerdberrerd^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bibbidj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:biddurrangkan^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bik^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bikku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bikkurr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bila^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bilem^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bim^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bininj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:birddurrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:birdi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:birli^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:birlmu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:birndu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:birradjdja^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:birrkala^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:biwudj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bod^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bokko^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bokorn^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bokung^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bolkdjamun^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bonbon^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bongka^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:borlborl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:borliblib^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:borlokko^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:borlorl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:borndok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:boywek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:budjdjulung^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:budjiked^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bukbuk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bukirri^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bula^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bulanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bulanjdjan^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bulbbe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bulikki^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bulkayh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bumabuma^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bungkurl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:bunje^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:burarr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:burd^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:burddal^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:buriburi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:burlng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:burlukkurri^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:burudjang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dabberrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dabbolk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dabborrabbolk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dabuno^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dadbe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dalkken^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:daluk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dangarrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dangmaye^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dangwarlah^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dedded^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:deddel^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:delek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:deleng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dikkala^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dilebang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dinidini^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dird^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dirdko^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dirdngukmak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djabbani^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djabbo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djabel^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djaberle^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djaddedde^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djaddi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djakarna^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djakerr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djalaban^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djalakkiradj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djalamardi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djalangkarridj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djalarr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djalwarra^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djambang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djamun^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djanay^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djandi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djarniman^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djarnngal^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djarrang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djawirna^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djebuyh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djedje^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djenj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djerli^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djerrh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djibdjib^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djidjnguk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djikirridj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djilawarnbed^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djilidjilih^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djilikuybi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djilimin^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djimurru^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djirddudjirddu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djirla^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djirndih^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djirribi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djirrihdiddid^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djodj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djord^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djorrkkun^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djudju^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djukerre^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djukka^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djulu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djungkay^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djunj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djurra^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djurrubuk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:djuwe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:doddorok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dolek^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dolobbo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dord^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:doydoy^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:duberrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dumdum^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:dunbuhmanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:durruyuk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:duruk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:duwa^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:duyh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kabbal^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kabbala^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kabbay^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kabbungurr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kabo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kabulwarnamyo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kakkak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kakkali^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kala^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kalarlbba^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kalarrwirdwird^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kalawan^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kalidjan^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kalkberd^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kalukku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kamanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kamarrang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kambani^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kambe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kambuk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kandidjdjawa^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kangkinj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kanjdjikanjdji^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kanjok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kardab^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karlba^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karldurrk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karlerrh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karlkki^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karnamarr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karnbowh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karndayh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karndjawarra^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karnubirr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrakbal^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karramalk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrang^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrard^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrardwarrekenh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrarla^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrawukka^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrbarda^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrekuyengkuyeng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrkad^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrkkanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:karrurru^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kawk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kawolk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kebbaldjurri^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kebbord^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kebdjirned^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kedjebe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kela^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kelbi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kernalk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kinga^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kinhkinh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kobakohbanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kodjbulu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kodjdjan^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kodjkulumak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kodjok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kokok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:komkerrnge^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:komorlo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:komrdawh^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:konjdja^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:konjkonj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kordbolbok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:korlobbarr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:korlonj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kornkumo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kornobolo^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kubba^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kubbulak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kubbunj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kudjewk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kukabel^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kukadje^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kukak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kukbele^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kukburlerri^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kukku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kulabbarl^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kuluban^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kuluyambi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kuluybirr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kumuken^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kunak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kunj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurdduk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurdukadji^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kured^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurlabakku^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurlbburru^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurndamen^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurobbe^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurrambalk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurrih^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurrukurldanj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurrula^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kurrung^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kururrkyahwurd^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kuwalili^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kuyal^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:kuybuk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:lama^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:lambalk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:lambarra^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:larrwa^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:lawk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:limbidj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:lirrkkurrmeng^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:loklok^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:lorrkkon^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:lulumarra^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:lumaluma^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:maddjurn^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:madj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:madjarndemed^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:madjawarr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mahbilil^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:makali^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:makka^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:makkakkurr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mako^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:malalalk^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:malalam^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:malambibbi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mam^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mamam^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mamumu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mararradj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mardayin^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marddarr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mardderr^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marebu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marla^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marladj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marlakka^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marlwa^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marndingunjngunj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marrabbi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marrabbi^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marradjiri^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marrakkak^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marram^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marrkidjbu^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marrngunj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:marrunj^ NominalSuffixes ;
[V.Noun]:mawah^ NominalSuffixes ;
